public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ertar artava/HNP [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artavau/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artave/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artavi/LN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artavo/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artemo/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar arten/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artendo/EF [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artese/G [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artesta/G [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar arteste/G [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artesti/G [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artesto/G [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar arteva/HNP [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artevau/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar arteve/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artevi/LN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artevo/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artion/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artisen/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artision/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artison/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artiven/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artivion/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artivié/N [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artiviéu/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artivon/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artié/N [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artiéu/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar arton/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàa/HNP [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàami/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàau/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàe/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàelo/Q [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàemi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artài/LN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàimo/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàimoni/K [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàitu/M [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artào/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàomi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvami/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvelo/Q [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvemi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvimo/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvimoni/K [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvitu/M [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artàvomi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artè/FN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artèu/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar arté/FN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéa/HNP [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéami/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéau/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artée/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéelo/Q [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéemi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéi/LN [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéimo/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéimoni/K [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéitu/M [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artémoni/K [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéo/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéomi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artéu/O [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévami/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévelo/Q [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévemi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévimo/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévimoni/K [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévitu/M [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar artévomi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrta/EFP [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrte/GHP [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrtelo/Q [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrtemi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrti/L [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrtitu/M [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrto/H [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertar èrtomi/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ertegar artegada/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegade/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegadi/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegado/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegando/EF pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegar/EF pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaralo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarami/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaratu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarave/PR pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaremo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaren/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaresi/N pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaresiu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarion/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarisen/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarision/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarisié/N pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarisiéu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarison/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarié/N pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegariéu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaron/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarà/HLP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaràe/P pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarè/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarèmi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaré/N pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarémoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarésimo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarésimoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaréu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaría/HLP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaríami/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaríatu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaríe/HP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaríelo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaríemi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegarò/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaròmi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegase/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegasta/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegaste/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegasti/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegasto/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegava/HNP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegavau/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegave/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegavi/LN pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegavo/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegemo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegen/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegendo/EF pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegese/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegesta/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegeste/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegesti/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegesto/G pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegeva/HNP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegevau/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegeve/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegevi/LN pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegevo/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegion/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegisen/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegision/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegison/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegiven/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegivion/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegivié/N pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegiviéu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegivon/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegié/N pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegiéu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegon/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàa/HNP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàami/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàau/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàe/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàelo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàemi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegài/LN pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàimo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàimoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàitu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegào/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàomi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvami/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvelo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvemi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvimo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvimoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvitu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegàvomi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegè/FN pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegèu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegé/FN pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéa/HNP pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéami/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéau/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegée/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéelo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéemi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéi/LN pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéimo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéimoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéitu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegémoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéo/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéomi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegéu/O pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévami/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévelo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévemi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévimo/J pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévimoni/K pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévitu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar artegévomi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtega/EFP pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtege/GHP pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtegelo/Q pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtegemi/I pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtegi/L pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtegitu/M pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtego/H pertegar
SFX A ertegar èrtegomi/I pertegar
SFX A ertir arte/GHP vertir
SFX A ertir artelo/Q vertir
SFX A ertir artemi/I vertir
SFX A ertir arten/J vertir
SFX A ertir artesta/G vertir
SFX A ertir arteste/G vertir
SFX A ertir artesti/G vertir
SFX A ertir artesto/G vertir
SFX A ertir arti/EFL vertir
SFX A ertir artida/G vertir
SFX A ertir artide/G vertir
SFX A ertir artidi/G vertir
SFX A ertir artido/G vertir
SFX A ertir artimo/J vertir
SFX A ertir artindo/EF vertir
SFX A ertir artion/J vertir
SFX A ertir artir/EF vertir
SFX A ertir artiralo/Q vertir
SFX A ertir artirami/I vertir
SFX A ertir artiratu/M vertir
SFX A ertir artirave/PR vertir
SFX A ertir artiremo/J vertir
SFX A ertir artiren/J vertir
SFX A ertir artiresi/N vertir
SFX A ertir artiresiu/O vertir
SFX A ertir artirion/J vertir
SFX A ertir artirisen/J vertir
SFX A ertir artirision/J vertir
SFX A ertir artirisié/N vertir
SFX A ertir artirisiéu/O vertir
SFX A ertir artirison/J vertir
SFX A ertir artirié/N vertir
SFX A ertir artiriéu/O vertir
