public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
alar/A
alterar/A
inanelar/A
inarđentar/A
artikolar/A
aŧelerar/A
axear/A
bagatelar/A
inbakukir/A
xbaliđar/A
inbalukar/A
xbanpir/A
barbajar/A
barufar/A
bateđar/A
dexbaular/A
xbefar/A
xberegar/A
strabéver/A
xbiankiđar/A
skonbinar/A
inbisakar/A
bocar/A
dexbokar/A
inbolsamar/A
inbonbaxar/A
inboreŧar/A
boteđar/A
xboxemar/A
bramar/A
xbraŧar/A
inbriagar/A
xbrodegar/A
bronbar/A
bruskar/A
inbulir/A
inbuxar/A
scanŧar/A
incavar/A
mancèñer/A
soscéñer/A
scinkar/A
dexdir/A
daneđar/A
xdentegar/A
devorŧiar/A
díxer/A
dolar/A
domestegar/A
dormenŧar/A
xdrelar/A
introdúxer/A
inđenerar/A
ađornar/A
rièser/A
rientrar/A
estínguer/A
exonerar/A
strafar/A
falir/A
falŧidiar/A
desfarinar/A
infaŧendar/A
kuantifegar/A
fegurar/A
ferar/A
sferdir/A
arfiar/A
sfiankonar/A
resfidar/A
desfilar/A
sfinir/A
infirmar/A
inafitar/A
sfodrar/A
afolar/A
straforar/A
formaliđar/A
arfosar/A
infrankar/A
fraskar/A
infraxar/A
frexar/A
infrolir/A
fufiñar/A
sprofumar/A
futuriđar/A
ingalar/A
ingamelar/A
xgañolar/A
xgarbujar/A
ingatolar/A
xgiñaŧar/A
paragonar/A
dexgoŧar/A
granir/A
ingranerar/A
gratar/A
dexgređar/A
grevar/A
gritar/A
ingropar/A
inguar/A
xguaratar/A
ingurar/A
ilkamar/A
inestar/A
inondar/A
insotar/A
intrajar/A
iterar/A
inɉarmar/A
reɉetar/A
ɉustar/A
skaenar/A
inkalir/A
skalkañar/A
inkalŧar/A
deskanar/A
inkanevar/A
skanpanotar/A
inkañir/A
kapitolar/A
karamelar/A
skarmir/A
skarpir/A
kasar/A
inkastronar/A
katekiđar/A
prokaŧar/A
skavaleŧar/A
skekeđar/A
inkodegar/A
skokar/A
inkolegar/A
koltivar/A
deskomodar/A
konfetar/A
konpanadegar/A
konsultar/A
kontrolar/A
skopelotar/A
skórer/A
konkordar/A
inkorniđar/A
skosar/A
inkoŧar/A
rekréder/A
kriar/A
skrokar/A
krostoliđar/A
skuadronar/A
inkuerar/A
deskuinternar/A
skulaŧar/A
traskurar/A
kúxer/A
languir/A
lapidar/A
xlatar/A
inleamar/A
dexleguar/A
levar/A
liberar/A
likuidar/A
xlisar/A
interlokuir/A
lordar/A
dexlubiar/A
dexluviar/A
magañar/A
malgamar/A
manaŧar/A
mankar/A
mañatar/A
marelar/A
marŧir/A
maskarar/A
matiđar/A
maxarar/A
intermeđar/A
dexmenar/A
xmentir/A
merkantar/A
malméter/A
mexonar/A
deminuir/A
mitigar/A
mokaɉar/A
momolar/A
stramontar/A
xmorbar/A
xmorgar/A
mostar/A
xmòver/A
tramudarar/A
dexmurar/A
mutilar/A
nanarar/A
naufragar/A
negriđar/A
ninegar/A
noliđar/A
dexnuar/A
xñarar/A
ociđar/A
inokular/A
inonbriar/A
ontolar/A
dexordenar/A
orsar/A
ovatar/A
inpacolar/A
pagontar/A
inpalar/A
spaliŧar/A
panar/A
panteđar/A
parer/A
parecar/A
departir/A
inparŧialiđar/A
apasionar/A
patar/A
despaŧar/A
inpaverar/A
arpegar/A
spelakiar/A
spenar/A
pendolar/A
inpensierir/A
perir/A
sperlongar/A
pestolar/A
despetenar/A
petufar/A
pianar/A
piatonar/A
spiegar/A
pindolar/A
piòver/A
inpirolar/A
inpiumar/A
platinar/A
poder/A
despolverar/A
despóner/A
skonpóner/A
apontar/A
pontiñar/A
repopolar/A
strasportar/A
postilar/A
inpotifar/A
premiar/A
represtinar/A
prexúmer/A
prontar/A
spulegar/A
spupilar/A
inputridir/A
eradegar/A
inraixar/A
ranɉar/A
rantolar/A
ratinar/A
recotar/A
regonar/A
arestar/A
ríder/A
iriŧar/A
ròder/A
abrogar/A
romàñer/A
korónper/A
derotar/A
dexruđenir/A
rumar/A
ruxar/A
sagomar/A
salir/A
saliđar/A
insalviar/A
insaonar/A
satiriđar/A
scantinar/A
sedar/A
strasekolar/A
proseguir/A
seitar/A
inselar/A
seneɉar/A
resentir/A
sepelir/A
sèrver/A
sfaltar/A
siamar/A
trasimar/A
insinuar/A
sixolar/A
skandaɉar/A
inskarpiar/A
inskatolar/A
skinŧar/A
skónder/A
skrinŧar/A
skuamar/A
sofistegar/A
insolentar/A
somejar/A
soñar/A
sorsar/A
spanar/A
spatolar/A
desperar/A
insospetir/A
despigolar/A
sospirar/A
spolar/A
spuacar/A
sorastar/A
instalar/A
stañar/A
instekar/A
stilar/A
institikir/A
instivalar/A
strafuñar/A
stransir/A
strigar/A
stronŧar/A
strusiar/A
persuàder/A
superbir/A
intajar/A
stanar/A
tardigar/A
tavernar/A
sotinténder/A
tentinagar/A
inkontèñer/A
aterar/A
testemoniar/A
titubar/A
stonfar/A
tortiɉar/A
kontràer/A
trankuiliđar/A
travajar/A
stridar/A
tronkar/A
tuar/A
turgar/A
reŧeđar/A
deŧernir/A
ŧimar/A
inŧokir/A
umiliar/A
vageđar/A
soravanŧar/A
travéder/A
revénder/A
konveñir/A
sovèñer/A
verolar/A
revestir/A
vinar/A
víver/A
revoler/A
ravòlxer/A
xbabaŧar/A
konxeñar/A
xlauranar/A
xufruir/A
